Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6210
Health profession,
defined.

Health profession shall mean a vocation involving health services,
health-related services, or environmental services requiring specialized knowledge
and training. Health profession does not include the vocation of duly recognized
members of the clergy acting in their ministerial capacity.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB834, § 10.